Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
OREGON CONSERVATION AND RECREATION FUND
SECTION 1.  Section 2, chapter 531, Oregon Laws 2019, is amended to read:
Sec. 2.  (1) The Oregon Conservation and Recreation Advisory Committee is established as an
advisory committee to the State Fish and Wildlife Commission  and the State Department of Fish and
Wildlife for the purpose of carrying out the duties described in subsection (2)  of this section. The
commission shall determine the number of members of  the committee and the geographical repre-
sentation by the members.  The Governor shall appoint the members of the committee. The Associ-
ate Director of Outdoor Recreation, or the associate director’s designee, shall serve  as a
nonvoting, ex officio member.
(2) The committee shall review department policies regarding the use of Oregon Conservation
and Recreation Fund moneys and make recommendations to the commission and  the department
regarding the use of fund moneys for implementing and administering department activities.
(3) Members of the committee may  not receive compensation for service as members. However,
subject to any applicable law  regulating travel and other expenses of state officers and employees,
a member may be reimbursed for actual  and necessary travel and other expenses incurred in the
performance of official duties  from moneys available to the department for the purpose of re-
imbursement of committee members.
(4) The department and the  committee jointly shall submit a biennial report to the Legislative
Assembly as provided in ORS 293.640 regarding the expenditure of moneys deposited in the  Oregon
Conservation and Recreation Fund established under section 1 [ of this 2019 Act ], chapter 531,
Oregon Laws 2019, and on the status of various activities funded by the moneys.
SECTION 2. Sections 4, 5 and 6, chapter 531, Oregon Laws 2019, are repealed.
SECTION 3. If this 2021 Act  does not become effective until after June 30, 2021, any
otherwise lawful action or obligation undertaken under authority of section 1, chapter 531,
Oregon Laws 2019, on or after July 1, 2021, and before the effective date of this 2021 Act  is
ratified and approved.
Enrolled House Bill 2171 (HB 2171-B) Page 1
SECTION 3a. (1) In addition to  and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is ap-
propriated to the Emergency Board, for the  biennium beginning July 1, 2021, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $1,000,000, to be allocated to the State  Department of Fish and
Wildlife for the purposes of the Oregon Conservation and Recreation Fund.
(2) The  State Fish and Wildlife Director may request that the board release funds ap-
propriated under this section. The board may only release the appropriated funds in incre-
ments that match deposits into the Oregon Conservation and Recreation Fund between  July
1, 2019, and  June 30, 2023, from sources other than state government, as defined in ORS
174.111.
STATEWIDE DESIGN STANDARDS
SECTION 4.
(1) The State Parks and Recreation Department shall  establish statewide
recommended standards for  the design of recreation projects, including trails, docks and
public recreation access points, to ensure that  state recreation areas are accessible to
members of the public of all mobility levels.
(2) The department  shall apply the statewide recommended standards to all future de-
partment recreation projects.
SECTION 5. The State Parks and Recreation Department shall develop the standards
described in section 4 of this 2021 Act no later than September 15, 2022.
SECTION 6. Section 5 of this 2021 Act is repealed on July 31, 2025.
OUTDOOR RECREATION ADVISORY COMMITTEE
SECTION 7. (1) The  Outdoor Recreation Advisory Committee is established as an advi-
sory committee to the Office of Outdoor Recreation for  the purpose of carrying out the du-
ties described in  subsection (2) of this section. The State Parks and Recreation Director,
upon consultation with the State Parks and Recreation  Commission, shall determine the
number of members of the committee. The  Governor shall appoint the members of the
committee, taking into consideration the geographic,  racial, ethnic and gender diversity of
this state and ensuring that a  majority of the committee members represent historically
underserved communities.
(2) The committee shall advise  the Associate Director of Outdoor Recreation and make
recommendations on statewide outdoor recreation policy under ORS 390.233 by:
(a) Reviewing statewide capacity for civic engagement  in outdoor recreation planning and
making recommendations to the office regarding options for increasing civic engagement;
(b) Evaluating and making recommendations for improvements  to current equity, diver-
sity and inclusion efforts regarding outdoor recreation planning;
(c) Providing recommendations for establishing and enhancing  opportunities for safe and
comfortable outdoor tourism and recreation for communities of color, members of  lesbian,
gay, bisexual, transgender,  queer or questioning (LGBTQ) communities, people with disabili-
ties and other historically marginalized groups;
(d) Facilitating input from Indian tribes and tribal organizations;
(e) Facilitating collaboration with other agency advisory committees; and
(f) Providing recommendations and facilitating public  input regarding any other issues
regarding increasing public access to outdoor recreation.
(3) Members of the  advisory committee are not entitled to compensation, but in the dis-
cretion of the State Parks and Recreation Director may be  reimbursed from funds available
to the State Parks and Recreation Department for actual and  necessary travel and other
expenses incurred by them in the performance of their official duties  in the manner and
amount provided in ORS 292.495.
Enrolled House Bill 2171 (HB 2171-B) Page 2
OUTDOOR RECREATION PASSES
SECTION 8. The Office of  Outdoor Recreation shall work with each state agency that
issues outdoor recreation passes, permits or licenses, including the  State Parks and Recre-
ation Department, State Department of Fish and Wildlife, Department of  Transportation and
State Marine Board, to  add links from the Office of Outdoor Recreation website to the
agency websites that provide information about how to purchase the outdoor  recreation
passes, permits or licenses.
SECTION 9. (1) The Office of Outdoor Recreation, in consultation with the Outdoor Re-
creation Advisory Committee, shall study and make recommendations for  legislation neces-
sary to create a single online storefront for outdoor recreation passes.
(2) The office shall submit the legislation recommended  under this section to the appro-
priate committee or committees of the Legislative Assembly no later  than September 15,
2021.
SECTION 10. Sections 8 and 9 of this 2021 Act are repealed on January 2, 2023.
INVENTORY AND GAP ANALYSIS
SECTION 11.  ORS 390.233 is amended to read:
390.233. (1) The  Office of Outdoor Recreation is established as an administrative section within
the State Parks and Recreation Department, subject to the supervision of the Associate  Director of
Outdoor Recreation and the policies and procedures established by, and  recommendations of, the
State Parks and Recreation Director and the State Parks and Recreation Commission.
(2) The office shall consist of the associate director and all personnel employed in the office.
(3) Subject to subsection (1) of this section, the office shall, in furtherance of  the state policy
declared in ORS 390.010:
(a) Coordinate outdoor recreation policy:
(A) Within the administrative divisions of the department; and
(B) Between the department and federal, state, regional and local government  entities and non-
governmental  entities.
(b) Assist  in developing or updating the outdoor recreation management strategies of the de-
partment.
(c) Collaborate with the Oregon Tourism Commission and the Travel Information Council to
create  effective  forums for communicating recreation-based initiatives and for sharing best practices.
(d) Serve as a clearinghouse and information center for outdoor recreation stakeholders.
(e) Develop data,  independently or through contracts with appropriate public or private agen-
cies, on the social, economic and resource impacts of outdoor recreation in this state.
(f) Promote the health and social benefits of  outdoor recreation in coordination with other re-
lated state programs and initiatives.
(g) Report on the office’s activities to the  State Parks and Recreation Commission four times
per year or as otherwise directed by the commission.
(4) The office shall coordinate and collaborate with the  Outdoor Recreation Advisory Com-
mittee established under section  7 of this 2021 Act, the  Oregon Business Development Depart-
ment, representatives of regional and local governments, the outdoor  recreation industry and other
outdoor recreation stakeholders to promote  economic development in this state. In furtherance of
promoting economic development, the office may  recommend, adopt or assist in the implementation
of policies and initiatives that:
(a) Encourage development of the outdoor recreation industry in a manner that improves rec-
reational opportunities in this state.
(b) Maximize  public and private investment in the outdoor recreation industry and in outdoor
recreation activities in this state.
(c) Enhance quality of life and economic vibrancy in communities across the state.
Enrolled House Bill 2171 (HB 2171-B) Page 3
(d) Strike a sensitive balance between development  and preservation of the unique natural ex-
perience provided by Oregon’s outdoor recreation  resources, and between motorized and nonmotor-
ized outdoor recreation activities.
(e) Take a  proactive approach to enhancing regional and local outdoor recreation infrastructure.
(5) The office  shall [ annually submit a report ] submit to the  appropriate committee or com-
mittees of the  Legislative Assembly [ on], at least once every five years,  a report that includes
an inventory  and gap analysis of outdoor recreation infrastructure in this state and a de-
scription of  the impacts of outdoor recreation in this state. The report required under this section
may include:
(a) Other information about the office’s activities; or
(b) Recommendations, which may include recommendations for legislation,  on policies and initi-
atives that may be adopted by the legislature, the State Parks and Recreation Department or  other
state agencies to enhance the experiences of persons engaging in outdoor recreation in this state.
SECTION 11a.
The report under ORS 390.233 (5), as amended by section 11 of this 2021
Act, is first due on or before September 15, 2026.
INCREASING ACCESS TO OUTDOOR RECREATION AND PRODUCTS
SECTION 12. (1) The  Office of Outdoor Recreation shall study and make recommenda-
tions for legislation  regarding options for increasing public access to outdoor recreation, in-
cluding by:
(a) Addressing disincentives in Oregon’s recreational immunity law.
(b) Increasing public and private funding to support outdoor recreation  access in Oregon.
(c) Expanding access and habitat programs.
(d) Collaborating with state institutions of higher education to  expand educational offer-
ings related to the outdoor recreation economy.
(e) Increasing the availability of prize moneys for state-permitted recreation events.
(2) The office shall submit  reports on its findings and any proposed legislation under this
section to  the appropriate committee or committees of the Legislative Assembly no later
than September 15, 2022.
SECTION 13.
(1) The Office of Outdoor Recreation  shall, in collaboration with the Oregon
Business Development Department,  design and propose legislation to implement a grant
program to support outdoor recreation products organizations and accelerators.
(2) The office shall submit the  proposed legislation under this section to the appropriate
committee or committees of the Legislative Assembly no later than September 15, 2022.
SECTION 14. Sections 12 and 13 of this 2021 Act are repealed on July 31, 2023.
CAPTIONS
SECTION 15. The unit captions  used in this 2021 Act are provided only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2021 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 16. This 2021 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2021 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled House Bill 2171 (HB 2171-B) Page 4
Passed by House June 24, 2021
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 26, 2021
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2021
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2171 (HB 2171-B) Page 5